Washington statutes.
RCW 16.58.160

Suspension of license awaiting investigation—Hearing.

The director may, when a certified feed lot's conditions become such that the integrity of reports or records of the cattle in that feed lot becomes doubtful, immediately suspend the certified feed lot's license until such time as the director can conduct an investigation to verify the condition of reports or records.

Upon notice by the director to suspend a license under this section, a person may request a hearing under chapter 34.05 RCW.

[ 2003 c 326 s 59; 1991 c 109 s 15; 1971 ex.s. c 181 s 16.]

NOTES:

Effective dates—2003 c 326: See RCW 16.57.902.